North Carolina statutes. Chapter 157. Housing Authorities and Projects.
Article 1. Housing Authorities Law.
§ 157-35.
Creation of regional housing authority.

If the board of county commissioners of each of two or more contiguous counties having an aggregate population of more than 60,000 by resolution declares that there is a need for one housing authority to be created for all of such counties to exercise powers and other functions herein prescribed for a housing authority in such counties, a public body corporate and politic to be known as a regional housing authority for all of such counties shall (after the commissioners thereof file an application with the Secretary of State as hereinafter provided) thereupon exist for and exercise its powers and other functions in such counties; and thereupon any housing authority created for any of such counties shall cease to exist except for the purpose of winding up its affairs and executing a deed to the regional housing authority as hereinafter provided: Provided, that the board of county commissioners shall not adopt a resolution as aforesaid if there is a county housing authority created for such county which has any bonds or notes outstanding unless first, all holders of such bonds and notes consent in writing to the substitution of such regional housing authority in lieu of such county housing authority on all such bonds and notes; and second, the commissioners of such county housing authority adopt a resolution consenting to the transfer of all the rights, contracts, obligations, and property, real and personal, of such county housing authority to such regional housing authority as hereinafter provided: Provided, further, that when the above conditions are complied with and such regional housing authority is created and authorized to exercise its powers and other functions, all rights, contracts, agreements, obligations, and property, real and personal, of such county housing authority shall be in the name of and vest in such regional housing authority, and all obligations of such county housing authority shall be the obligations of such regional housing authority and all rights and remedies of any person against such county housing authority may be asserted, enforced, and prosecuted against such regional housing authority to the same extent as they might have been asserted, enforced, and prosecuted against such county housing authority. When any real property of a county housing authority vests in a regional housing authority as provided above, the county housing authority shall execute a deed of such property to the regional housing authority which thereupon shall file such deed in the office provided for the filing of deeds: Provided, that nothing contained in this sentence shall affect the vesting of property in the regional housing authority as provided above.

The board of county commissioners of each of two or more said contiguous counties shall by resolution declare that there is a need for one regional housing authority to be created for all of such counties to exercise powers and other functions herein prescribed in such counties, if such board of county commissioners finds (and only if it finds)

Insanitary or unsafe dwelling accommodations exist in the area of its respective county and/or there is a lack of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations in the county available for all the inhabitants thereof and

That a regional housing authority for the proposed region would be a more efficient or economical administrative unit than a housing authority for an area having a smaller population to carry out the purposes of the housing authorities law and any amendments thereto, in such county.

In determining whether dwelling accommodations are unsafe or insanitary, the board of county commissioners shall take into consideration the following: the physical condition and age of the buildings; the degree of overcrowding; the percentage of land coverage; the light and air available to the inhabitants of such dwelling accommodations; the size and arrangement of the rooms; the sanitary facilities; and the extent to which conditions exist in such buildings which endanger life or property by fire or other causes.

If it shall determine that both (1) and (2) of the above enumerated conditions exist, the board of county commissioners shall adopt a resolution so finding (which need not go into any detail other than the mere finding). After the appointment, as hereinafter provided, of the commissioners to act as the regional housing authority, said authority shall be a public body and a body corporate and politic upon the completion of the taking of the following proceedings:

The commissioners shall present to the Secretary of State an application signed by them, which shall set forth (without any detail other than the mere recital)

(1)

That the boards of county commissioners made the aforesaid determination and that they have been appointed as commissioners;

(2)

The name, and official residence of each of the commissioners, together with a certified copy of the appointment evidencing their right to office, the date and place of induction into and taking oath of office, and that they desire the housing authority to become a public body and a body corporate and politic under this Article;

The term of office of each of the commissioners;

The name which is proposed for the corporation; and

The location of the principal office of the proposed corporation.

The application shall be subscribed and sworn to by each of said commissioners before an officer authorized by the laws of the State to take and certify oaths, who shall certify upon the application that he personally knows the commissioners and knows them to be the officers as asserted in the application, and that each subscribed and swore thereto in the officer’s presence. The Secretary of State shall examine the application and if he finds that the name proposed for the corporation is not identical with that of a person or of any other corporation of this State or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty he shall receive and file it and shall record it in an appropriate book of record in his office.

When the application has been made, filed and recorded, as herein provided, the authority shall constitute a public body and a body corporate and politic under the name proposed in the application; the Secretary of State shall make and issue to the said commissioners, a certificate of incorporation pursuant to this Article, under the seal of the State, and shall record the same with the application.

In any suit, action or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of, or relating to any contract of the regional housing authority, the regional housing authority shall be conclusively deemed to have been established in accordance with the provisions of this Article upon proof of the issuance of the aforesaid certificate by the Secretary of State. A copy of such certificate, duly certified by the Secretary of State, shall be admissible in evidence in any such suit, action or proceeding, and shall be conclusive proof of the filing and contents thereof.

History.

1941, c. 78, s. 4; 1943, c. 636, ss. 3, 7; 1998-217, s. 20.

§ 157-36.
Commissioners of regional housing authority.

The board of county commissioners of each county included in a regional housing authority shall appoint one person as a commissioner of such authority, and each such commissioner to be first appointed by the board of county commissioners of a county may be appointed at or after the time of the adoption of the resolution declaring the need for such regional housing authority or declaring the need for the inclusion of such county in the area of operation of such regional housing authority. When the area of operation of a regional housing authority is increased to include an additional county or counties as provided in this Article, the board of county commissioners of each such county shall thereupon appoint one additional person as a commissioner of the regional housing authority. The board of county commissioners of each county shall appoint the successor of the commissioner appointed by it.

The commissioners of the regional housing authority shall appoint as a commissioner at least one person who is directly assisted by the authority unless the authority’s rules require that the person be elected by other persons who are assisted by the authority. However, there shall be no requirement to appoint such a person if the authority: (i) operates less than 300 public housing units, (ii) provides reasonable notice to all resident advisory boards within the authority’s area of operation of the opportunity for at least one person who is directly assisted by the authority to serve as a commissioner, and (iii) within a reasonable time after receipt of the notice by the resident advisory boards, has not been notified of the intention of any such person to serve. The commissioners of the regional housing authority shall appoint successors of the commissioner appointed by them and shall fill any vacancies. A certificate of the appointment signed by the chair of the commissioners of the regional housing authority shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper selection of the commissioner. If the commissioner directly assisted by the regional housing authority ceases to receive such assistance, the commissioner’s office shall be abolished and another person who is directly assisted by the regional housing authority shall be appointed by the commissioners of the regional housing authority.

No commissioner who is also a person directly assisted by the regional housing authority shall be qualified to vote on matters affecting his or her official conduct or matters affecting his or her own individual tenancy, as distinguished from matters affecting tenants in general.

If any county is excluded from the area of operation of a regional housing authority, the office of the commissioner of such regional housing authority appointed by the board of county commissioners of such county shall be thereupon abolished. If the person appointed as a commissioner under subsection (b) of this section resides in a county that is excluded from the authority’s area of operation, the office of that commissioner shall be abolished and another person residing within the authority’s area of operation shall be appointed.

A certificate of the appointment of any commissioner signed by the chair of the board of county commissioners (or the appointing officer) shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such commissioner.

If the area of operation of a regional housing authority consists at any time of an even number of counties, except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, the Governor shall appoint one additional commissioner to such regional housing authority whose term of office shall be as herein provided for a commissioner of a regional housing authority, except that such term shall end at any earlier time that the area of operation of the regional housing authority shall be changed to consist of an odd number of counties. The Governor shall likewise appoint each person to succeed such additional commissioner. A certificate of the appointment of any such additional commissioner shall be signed by the Governor and filed with the Secretary of State. A copy of such certificate, duly certified by the Secretary of State, shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such additional commissioner.

If the membership of the board of commissioners consists of an even number as a result of the appointment of a person who is directly assisted by the regional housing authority, the Governor shall appoint one additional commissioner to the authority whose term of office shall be as herein provided for a commissioner of an authority, except that such term shall end at any earlier time that the area of operation of the authority shall be changed to consist of an even number of counties. A certificate of the appointment shall be signed and filed as provided in subsection (f) of this section. The Governor shall appoint successors to the additional commissioner and shall fill any vacancies.

The commissioners of a regional housing authority shall be appointed for terms of five years except that all vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired terms. Each commissioner shall hold office until his or her successor has been appointed and has qualified.

For inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, a commissioner of a regional housing authority may be removed by the appointing authority. The commissioner shall have been given a copy of the charges against him or her at least 10 days prior to the hearing thereon and shall have had an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel.

The commissioners appointed as aforesaid shall constitute the regional housing authority, and the powers of such authority shall be vested in such commissioners in office from time to time.

The commissioners of a regional housing authority shall elect a chair from among the commissioners and shall have power to select or employ such other officers and employees as the regional housing authority may require. A majority of the commissioners of a regional housing authority shall constitute a quorum of such authority for the purpose of conducting its business and exercising its powers and for all other purposes.

History.

1941, c. 78, s. 4; 1943, c. 636, s. 4; 1999-146, s. 2.

§ 157-37.
Powers of regional housing authority.

Except as otherwise provided herein, a regional housing authority and the commissioners thereof shall, within the area of operation of such regional housing authority, have the same functions, rights, powers, duties and limitations provided for housing authorities created for cities or counties and the commissioners of such housing authorities: Provided, that for such purposes the term “mayor” or “council” as used in the Housing Authorities Law and any amendments thereto shall be construed as meaning “board of county commissioners,” the term “city clerk” as used therein shall be construed as meaning “clerk of the board of county commissioners” and the term “city” as used therein shall be construed as meaning “county” unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context: Provided, further, that a regional housing authority shall not be subject to the limitations provided in subdivision (4) of

G.S. 157-29

of the Housing Authorities Law with respect to housing projects for farmers of low income. Except as otherwise provided in this Article, all the provisions of law applicable to housing authorities created for counties and the commissioners of such authorities shall be applicable to regional housing authorities and the commissioners thereof.

History.

1941, c. 78, s. 4; 1943, c. 636, s. 6.

§ 157-38.
Rural housing projects.

Housing authorities created for counties and regional housing authorities are specifically empowered and authorized to borrow money, accept grants and exercise their other powers to provide housing for farmers of low income. In connection with such projects, such housing authorities may enter into such lease or purchase agreements, accept such conveyances and rent or sell dwellings forming part of such projects to or for farmers of low income, as such housing authority deems necessary in order to assure the achievement of the objectives of this Article. Such leases, agreements or conveyances may include such covenants as the housing authority deems appropriate regarding such dwellings and the tracts of land described in any such instrument, which covenants shall be deemed to run with the land where the housing authority deems it necessary and the parties to such instrument so stipulate. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as limiting any other powers of any housing authority.

History.

1941, c. 78, s. 4.

§ 157-39.
Housing applications by farmers.

The owner of any farm operated, or worked upon, by farmers of low income in need of safe and sanitary housing may file an application with a housing authority of a county or a regional housing authority requesting that it provide for a safe and sanitary dwelling or dwellings for occupancy by such farmers of low income. Such applications shall be received and examined by housing authorities in connection with the formulation of projects or programs to provide housing for farmers of low income.

History.

1941, c. 78, s. 4.

§ 157-39.1.
Area of operation of city, county and regional housing authorities.

The boundaries or area of operation of a housing authority created for a city shall include said city and the area within 10 miles from the territorial boundaries of said city, but in no event shall it include the whole or a part of any other city, except as otherwise provided herein. Notwithstanding the previous sentence, a housing authority created for a city may operate and perform any of its lawful functions within any other city that has a common boundary with a city creating an authority when requested to do so by resolution of the governing body of such other city. The area of operation or boundaries of a housing authority created for a county shall include all of the county for which it is created and the area of operation or boundaries of a regional housing authority shall include (except as otherwise provided elsewhere in this Article) all of the counties for which such regional housing authority is created and established: Provided, that a county or regional housing authority shall not undertake any housing project or projects within the boundaries of any city unless a resolution shall have been adopted by the governing body of such city (and also by any housing authority which shall have been theretofore established and authorized to exercise its powers in such city) declaring that there is a need for the county or regional housing authority to exercise its power within such city: Provided, that the jurisdiction of any rural housing authority to which the Secretary of State has heretofore issued a certificate of incorporation shall extend to within a distance of one mile of the town or city limits of any town or city having a population in excess of 500, located in any county now or hereafter constituting a part of the territory of such rural housing authority: Provided, further, that this provision shall not affect the jurisdiction of any city housing authority to which the Secretary of State has heretofore issued a certificate of incorporation. A housing authority created for a county may operate and perform any of its lawful functions anywhere within the municipal boundaries of any city located in whole or in part within the county for which it is created, when requested to do so by resolution of the governing body of such city.

In any county in which a city housing authority has been established, but where there are portions of the county in which the city is located which are more than 10 miles from the territorial boundaries of the city, the city housing authority is authorized to operate in areas of the county beyond such limit, which are not within another city, upon the adoption of a joint resolution by the city council and the board of county commissioners. Such joint resolution must find that in such additional area, that insanitary or unsafe inhabited dwelling accommodations exist in such area or there is a shortage of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations in such county available to persons of low income at rentals they can afford. A public hearing on such resolution need be held only by the board of county commissioners.

A joint resolution adopted under subsection (b) of this section may, in lieu of the appointment provisions of

G.S. 157-5

, provide that the board of commissioners of the housing authority shall be composed of nine members, with a number (not less than five) to be appointed by the mayor, and the remainder to be appointed by the board of county commissioners. Such housing authority commissioners shall be subject to removal by the appointing person or board under the procedural requirements of

G.S. 157-8

.

History.

1943, c. 636, s. 5; 1961, c. 200, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1108, ss. 1, 2; 1993, c. 458, s. 1.

§ 157-39.2.
Increasing area of operation of regional housing authority.

The area of operation or boundaries of a regional housing authority shall be increased from time to time to include one or more additional contiguous counties not already within a regional housing authority if the board of county commissioners of each of the counties then included in the area of operation of such regional housing authority, the commissioners of the regional housing authority and the board of county commissioners of each such additional county or counties each adopts a resolution declaring that there is a need for the inclusion of such additional county or counties in the area of operation of such regional housing authority. Upon the adoption of such resolutions, any county housing authority created for any such additional county shall cease to exist except for the purpose of winding up its affairs and executing a deed to the regional housing authority as hereinafter provided. Provided, however, that such resolutions shall not be adopted unless the commissioners of such county housing authority adopt a resolution consenting to the transfer of all the rights, contracts, bonds, and property, real and personal, of such county housing authority to such regional housing authority as hereinafter provided: Provided, further, that when the above condition is complied with and the area of operation of such regional housing authority is increased to include such additional county, as hereinabove provided, all rights, contracts, bonds, and property, real and personal, of such county housing authority shall be in the name of and vested in such regional housing authority, all contracts and bonds of such county housing authority shall be the contracts and bonds of such regional housing authority and all rights and remedies of any person against such county housing authority may be asserted, enforced, and prosecuted against such regional housing authority to the same extent as they might have been asserted, enforced, and prosecuted against such county housing authority.

When any real property of a county housing authority vests in a regional housing authority as provided above, the county housing authority shall execute a deed of such property to the regional housing authority which thereupon shall file such deed in the office provided for the filing of deeds: Provided, that nothing contained in this sentence shall affect the vesting of property in the regional housing authority as provided above.

The board of county commissioners of each of the counties in the regional housing authority, the commissioners of the regional housing authority and the board of county commissioners of each such additional county or counties shall by resolution declare that there is a need for the inclusion of such county or counties in the area of operation of the regional housing authority, only if:

The board of county commissioners of each such additional county or counties find that insanitary or unsafe inhabited dwelling accommodations exist in such county or there is a shortage of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations in such county available to persons of low income at rentals they can afford, and

The board of county commissioners of each of the counties then included in the area of operation of the regional housing authority, the commissioners of the regional housing authority and the board of county commissioners of each such additional county or counties find that the regional housing authority would be a more efficient or economical administrative unit if the area of operation of the regional housing authority is increased to include such additional county or counties.

History.

1943, c. 636, s. 5; 1971, c. 431, s. 1.

§ 157-39.3.
Decreasing area of operation of regional housing authority.

The area of operation or boundaries of a regional housing authority shall be decreased from time to time to exclude one or more counties from such area if the board of county commissioners of each of the counties in such area and the commissioners of the regional housing authority each adopt a resolution declaring that there is a need for excluding such county or counties from such area: Provided, that if such action decreases the area of operation of the regional housing authority to only one county, such authority shall thereupon constitute and become a housing authority for such county, in the same manner as though such authority were created, and constituted a public and corporate body for such county pursuant to other provisions of this housing authority law, and the commissioners of such authority shall be thereupon appointed as provided for the appointment of commissioners of a housing authority created for a county.

The board of county commissioners of each of the counties in the area of operation of the regional housing authority and the commissioners of the regional housing authority shall adopt a resolution declaring that there is a need for excluding a county or counties from such area only if:

Each such board of county commissioners of the counties to remain in the area of operation of the regional housing authority and the commissioners of the regional housing authority find that, because of facts arising or determined subsequent to the time when such area first included the county or counties to be excluded, the regional housing authority would be a more efficient or economical administrative unit if such county or counties were excluded from such area, and

The board of county commissioners of each county or counties to be excluded and the commissioners of the regional housing authority each also find that another housing authority for such county or counties would be a more efficient or economical administrative unit to function in such county or counties.

Nothing contained herein shall be construed as preventing a county or counties excluded from the area of operation of a regional housing authority, as provided above, from thereafter being included within the area of operation of any housing authority in accordance with this Article.

Any property held by a regional housing authority within a county or counties excluded from the area of operation of such authority as herein provided, shall, as soon as practicable after the exclusion of said county or counties, respectively, be disposed of by such authority in the public interest.

History.

1943, c. 636, s. 5; 1971, c. 431, s. 2.

§ 157-39.4.
Requirements of public hearings.

The board of county commissioners of a county shall not adopt any resolution authorized by

G.S. 157-35

, 157-39.1, 157-39.2 or 157-39.3 unless a public hearing has first been held which shall conform (except as otherwise provided herein) to the requirements of this Housing Authorities Law for hearings to determine the need for a housing authority of a county: Provided, that such hearings may be held by the board of county commissioners without a petition therefor.

In connection with the issuance of bonds, a regional housing authority may covenant as to limitations on its right to adopt resolutions relating to the increase or decrease of its area of operation.

History.

1943, c. 636, s. 5; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1108, s. 3.

§ 157-39.5.
Consolidated housing authority.

If the governing body of each of two or more municipalities (with a population of less than 500, but having an aggregate population of more than 500) by resolution declares that there is a need for one housing authority for all of such municipalities to exercise in such municipalities the powers and other functions prescribed for a housing authority, a public body corporate and politic to be known as a consolidated housing authority (with such corporate name as it selects) shall thereupon exist for all of such municipalities and exercise its powers and other functions within its area of operation (as herein defined), including the power to undertake projects therein; and thereupon any housing authority created for any of such municipalities shall cease to exist except for the purpose of winding up its affairs and executing a deed of its real property to the consolidated housing authority: Provided, that the creation of a consolidated housing authority and the finding of need therefor shall be subject to the same provisions and limitations of this Housing Authorities Law as are applicable to the creation of a regional housing authority and that all of the provisions of this Housing Authorities Law applicable to regional housing authorities and the commissioners thereof shall be applicable to consolidated housing authorities and the commissioners thereof: Provided, further that the area of operation or boundaries of a consolidated housing authority shall include all of the territory within the boundaries of each municipality joining in the creation of such authority together with the territory within 10 miles of the boundaries of each such municipality, except that such area of operation may be changed to include or exclude any municipality or municipalities (with its aforesaid surrounding territory) in the same manner and under the same provisions as provided in this Article for changing the area of operation of a regional housing authority by including or excluding a contiguous county or counties: Provided, further, that for all such purposes the term “board of county commissioners” shall be construed as meaning “governing body” except in

G.S. 157-36

, where it shall be construed as meaning “mayor” or other executive head of the municipality, the term “county” shall be construed as meaning “municipality,” the term “clerk” shall be construed as meaning “clerk of the municipality or officer with similar duties,” the term “region” shall be construed as meaning “area of operation of the consolidated housing authority” and the terms “county housing authority” and “regional housing authority” shall be construed as meaning “housing authority of the city” and “consolidated housing authority,” respectively, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context.

The governing body of any such municipality for which a housing authority has not been created may adopt the above resolution if it first determines that there is a need for a housing authority to function in said municipality, which determination shall be made in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as the determination required by

G.S. 157-4

for the creation of a housing authority for a city: Provided, that after notice given by the clerk (or officer with similar duties) of the municipality, the governing body of the municipality may, without a petition therefor, hold a hearing to determine the need for a housing authority to function therein.

Except as otherwise provided herein, a consolidated housing authority and the commissioners thereof shall, within the area of operation of such consolidated housing authority have the same functions, rights, powers, duties, privileges, immunities and limitations as those provided for housing authorities created for cities, counties, or groups of counties and the commissioners of such housing authorities, in the same manner as though all the provisions of law applicable to housing authorities created for cities, counties, or groups of counties were applicable to consolidated housing authorities.

History.

1943, c. 636, s. 5; 1961, c. 200, s. 3; 1965, c. 431, s. 3.

§ 157-39.6.
Findings required for authority to operate in municipality.

No governing body of a city or other municipality shall adopt a resolution as provided in

G.S. 157-39.1

declaring that there is a need for a housing authority (other than a housing authority established by such municipality) to exercise its powers within such municipality, unless a public hearing has first been held by such governing body and unless such governing body shall have found in substantially the following terms: (i) that insanitary or unsafe inhabited dwelling accommodations exist in such municipality or that there is a shortage of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations in such municipality available to persons of low income at rentals they can afford; and (ii) that these conditions can be best remedied through the exercise of the aforesaid housing authority’s powers within the territorial boundaries of such municipality: Provided, that such findings shall not have the effect of thereafter preventing such municipality from establishing a housing authority or joining in the creation of a consolidated housing authority or the increase of the area of operation of a consolidated housing authority. The clerk (or the officer with similar duties) of the city or other municipality shall give notice of the public hearing and such hearing shall be held in the manner provided in

G.S. 157-4

for a public hearing by a council to determine the need for a housing authority in the city.

During the time that, pursuant to these findings, a housing authority has outstanding (or is under contract to issue) any evidences of indebtedness for a project within the city or other municipality, no other housing authority may undertake a project within such municipality without the consent of said housing authority which has such outstanding indebtedness or obligation.

History.

1943, c. 636, s. 5.

§ 157-39.7.
Meetings and residence of commissioners.

Nothing contained in this Housing Authorities Law shall be construed to prevent meetings of the commissioners of a housing authority anywhere within the perimeter boundaries of the area of operation of the authority or within any additional area where the housing authority is authorized to undertake a housing project, nor to prevent the appointment of any person as a commissioner of the authority who resides within such boundaries or such additional area, and who is otherwise eligible for such appointment under this Housing Authorities Law.

History.

1943, c. 636, s. 5.

§ 157-39.8.
Agreement to sell as security for obligations to federal government.

In any contract or amendatory or superseding contract for a loan and annual contributions heretofore or hereafter entered into between a housing authority and the federal government with respect to any housing project undertaken by said housing authority, any such housing authority is authorized to make such covenants (including covenants with holders of bonds issued by such authority for purposes of the project involved), and to confer upon the federal government such rights and remedies, as said housing authority deems necessary to assure the fulfillment of the purposes for which the project was undertaken. In any such contract, the housing authority may, notwithstanding any other provisions of law, agree to sell and convey the project (including all lands appertaining thereto) to which such contract relates to the federal government upon the occurrence of such conditions, or upon such defaults on bonds for which any of the annual contributions provided in said contract are pledged, as may be prescribed in such contract, and at a price (which may include the assumption by the federal government of the payment, when due, of the principal of and interest on outstanding bonds of the housing authority issued for purposes of the project involved) determined as prescribed therein and upon such other terms and conditions as are therein provided. Any such housing authority is hereby authorized to enter into such supplementary contracts, and to execute such conveyances, as may be necessary to carry out the provisions hereof. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, any contracts or supplementary contracts or conveyances made or executed pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not be or constitute a mortgage within the meaning or for the purposes of any of the laws of the State.

History.

1943, c. 636, s. 5.